test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-noorikkw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - noorikkõ :   # should decline like the paradigm 'p_luzikkõ'
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+Nom: noorikkõ
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+Nom: noorikõd
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+Gen: noorika
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+Gen: [noorikkoi, noorikkojõ]
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+Par: [noorikka, noorikkaa]
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+Par: [noorikkoi, noorikkoitõ]
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+Ill: [noorikka, noorikkasõ]
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+Ill: noorikkoisõ
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+Ine: noorikõz
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+Ine: noorikkoiz
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+Ela: noorikõssõ
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+Ela: noorikkoissõ
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+All: noorikgõllõ
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+All: noorikkoillõ
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+Ade: noorikõl
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+Ade: noorikkoil
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+Abl: noorikõltõ
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+Abl: noorikkoiltõ
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+Tra: noorikõssi
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+Tra: noorikkoissi
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+Ter: noorikkassaa
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+Ter: noorikkoissaa
    noorikkõ+N+Sg+Com: noorikaka
    noorikkõ+N+Pl+Com: noorikkoika
